hunspell-manchu/mnc-latin.aff
SET	UTF-8

# Nominal suffixes
SFX N Y 7
SFX N 0 0 .
SFX N 0 ni ng
SFX N 0 i .
SFX N 0 be .
SFX N 0 de .
SFX N 0 ci .
SFX N 0 ingge .

# Verbal -me|ci|ki suffixes
SFX V Y 24
SFX V 0 0 .
SFX V 0 mbi .
SFX V 0 mbidere
SFX V 0 mbihe .
SFX V 0 mbihebi .
SFX V 0 mbihede .
SFX V 0 mbihekai .
SFX V 0 mbihengge .
SFX V 0 mbiheni .
SFX V 0 mbiheo .
SFX V 0 mbikai .
SFX V 0 mbime .
SFX V 0 mbina .
SFX V 0 mbini .
SFX V 0 mbinikai .
SFX V 0 mbinio .
SFX V 0 mbio .
SFX V 0 ci .
SFX V 0 cibe .
SFX V 0 cina .
SFX V 0 ki .
SFX V 0 kini .
SFX V 0 me .
SFX V 0 meo .

# Verbal -nggala|nggele|nggolo form
SFX l Y 3
SFX l 0 nggala a
SFX l 0 nggele e
SFX l 0 nggolo o


# Verbal -fi form
SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 fi .

# Verbal -pi form
SFX p Y 1
SFX p 0 pi .

# Verbal -mpi form
SFX m Y 1
SFX m 0 mpi .


# Suffixes after r[aeo]|ndara|ndere|ndoro form
SFX R Y 4
SFX R 0 de .
SFX R 0 lame .
SFX R 0 le .
SFX R 0 ngge .




# Verbal -ra|re|ro suffixes
SFX r Y 21
SFX r 0 ra a
SFX r 0 rade a
SFX r 0 rakv .
SFX r 0 rakvngge .
SFX r 0 ralame a
SFX r 0 rale a
SFX r 0 ralengge a
SFX r 0 rangge a
SFX r 0 re e
SFX r 0 rede [eui]
SFX r 0 rekvngge e
SFX r 0 relame e
SFX r 0 rele e
SFX r 0 releme e
SFX r 0 relengge e
SFX r 0 rengge e
SFX r 0 ro o
SFX r 0 rolame e
SFX r 0 role o
SFX r 0 rolome e
SFX r 0 rongge o



# Verbal -ndara|ndere|ndoro suffixes
SFX n Y 21
SFX n 0 ndara a
SFX n 0 ndarade a
SFX n 0 ndarakv .
SFX n 0 ndarakvngge .
SFX n 0 ndaralame a
SFX n 0 ndarale a
SFX n 0 ndaralengge a
SFX n 0 ndarangge a
SFX n 0 ndere e
SFX n 0 nderede [eui]
SFX n 0 nderekvngge e
SFX n 0 ndereleme e
SFX n 0 nderelame e
SFX n 0 nderele e
SFX n 0 nderelengge e
SFX n 0 nderengge e
SFX n 0 ndoro o
SFX n 0 ndorole o
SFX n 0 ndorolome o
SFX n 0 ndoroleme o
SFX n 0 ndorongge o


# Suffixes after (h|k|ngk)[aeo] form
SFX H Y 11
SFX H 0 bi .
SFX H 0 bici .
SFX H 0 bihe .
SFX H 0 bikai .
SFX H 0 de .
SFX H 0 i .
SFX H 0 kv .
SFX H 0 kvbi .	
SFX H 0 le .
SFX H 0 lengge .
SFX H 0 ngge .



# Verb -h[aeo] form
SFX h Y 34
SFX h 0 ha [auvi]
SFX h 0 he [eui]        
SFX h 0 ho o
SFX h 0 hade [auvi]
SFX h 0 hede [eu]
SFX h 0 hode o
SFX h 0 habi [auvi]
SFX h 0 hebi [eu]
SFX h 0 hobi o
SFX h 0 habikai [auvi]
SFX h 0 hebikai [eu]
SFX h 0 hobikai o
SFX h 0 habihe [auvi]
SFX h 0 hebihe [eu]
SFX h 0 hobihe o
SFX h 0 habici [auvi]
SFX h 0 hebici [eu]
SFX h 0 hobici o
SFX h 0 hangge [auvi]
SFX h 0 hengge [eu]
SFX h 0 hongge [eu]
SFX h 0 hale   [auvi]
SFX h 0 hele   [eu]
SFX h 0 halengge   [auvi]
SFX h 0 helengge   [eu]
SFX h 0 hakv [auvi]
SFX h 0 hekv [eu]
SFX h 0 hokv o
SFX h 0 hakvbi [auvi]
SFX h 0 hekvbi [eu]
SFX h 0 hokvbi o
SFX h 0 hai [auvi]
SFX h 0 hei [eu]
SFX h 0 hoi o

# Verb -k[aeo] form
SFX k Y 25
SFX k 0 ka [auvi]
SFX k 0 ke [eui]        
SFX k 0 ko o
SFX k 0 kabi [auvi]
SFX k 0 kebi [eu]
SFX k 0 kobi o
SFX k 0 kabihe [auvi]
SFX k 0 kebihe [eu]
SFX k 0 kobihe o
SFX k 0 kabici [auvi]
SFX k 0 kebici [eu]
SFX k 0 kobici o
SFX k 0 kangge [auvi]
SFX k 0 kengge [eu]
SFX k 0 kongge [eu]
SFX k 0 kale   [auvi]
SFX k 0 kele   [eu]
SFX k 0 kalengge   [auvi]
SFX k 0 kelengge   [eu]
SFX k 0 kakv [auvi]
SFX k 0 kekv [eu]
SFX k 0 kokv o
SFX k 0 kai [auvi]
SFX k 0 kei [eu]
SFX k 0 koi o


# Verb -ngk[aeo] form
SFX g Y 25
SFX g 0 ngka [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngke [eu]        
SFX g 0 ngko o
SFX g 0 ngkabi [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkebi [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkobi o
SFX g 0 ngkabihe [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkebihe [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkobihe o
SFX g 0 ngkabici [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkebici [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkobici o
SFX g 0 ngkangge [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkengge [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkongge [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkale   [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkele   [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkalengge   [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkelengge   [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkakv [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkekv [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkokv o
SFX g 0 ngkai [auvi]
SFX g 0 ngkei [eu]
SFX g 0 ngkoi o
