hunspell-manchu/mnc-latin.dic
aba/N
abdaha/N
abdari/N
abka/N
abkana/N
absa/N
absa/Vrlfk
absalan/N
absi/N
abuli/Vrlfk
acamja/Vrlfh
acana/Vrlfh
aci/Vrlfk
ada/Vrlfh
adana/Vrlfh
afata/Vrlfh
ahvcila/Vrlfh
ai/N
aisila/Vrlfh
aisilanu/Vrlfh
aka/Vrlfk
akdula/Vrlfh
akja/Vrlfk
aksa/Vrlfk
aksabu/Vrlfh
ala/N
alana/Vrlfh
aldangga/N
algi/Vrlfk
algixa/Vrlfh
alixa/Vrlfk
alixabu/Vrlfh
ambara/Vrlfh
amdulabu/Vrlfh
ana/Vrlfh
andan/N
anggala/Vrlfh
arbuxa/Vrlfh
arsu/Vrlfk
asukilabu/Vrlfh
axxandu/Vrlfh
baba/N
badara/Vrlfk
bahana/Vrlfh
baicana/Vrlfh
baitalabu/Vrlfh
bakja/Vrlfk
bakta/Vrlfh
bara/Vrlfh
bargiyata/Vrlfh
baya/Vrlfk
bayambumbibayabu/Vrlfh
becebu/Vrlfh
bejile/Vrlfh
bektere/Vrlfh
bene/Vrlfh
bere/Vrlfh
beye/N
bile/Vrlfh
bilja/Vrlfk
bilu/Vrlfh
bisa/Vrlfk
bixubu/Vrlfh
biya/N
biyaldasita/Vrlfh
bofula/Vrlfh
bohibu/Vrlfh
bonggimbibunggi/Vrlfh
bontoholo/Vrlfh
boo/N
bu/Vrlfh
buburxe/Vrlfh
buja/Vrlfk
buju/Vrlfh
bujubu/Vrlfh
bukta/Vrlfk
bulduri/Vrlfh
buraxa/Vrlfh
burulanu/Vrlfh
butu/N
buyendu/Vrlfh
cakja/Vrlfk
canggali/Vrlfh
cangka/Vrlfh
cargi/N
cende/Vrlfh
cendebu/Vrlfh
cihangga/N
cikexe/Vrlfh
cikirxa/Vrlfh
ciksi/Vrlfk
ciktara/Vrlfk
cilci/Vrlfk
ciralabu/Vrlfh
cirhv/Vrlfh
coho/Vrlfh
colabu/Vrlfh
cuku/Vrlfh
cukule/Vrlfh
cumcura/Vrlfh
dabdurxa/Vrlfh
dabgi/Vrlfh
dabkvrila/Vrlfh
dahala/Vrlfh
dahalabu/Vrlfh
dahi/Vrlfh
dailanabu/Vrlfh
daisela/Vrlfh
dalabu/Vrlfh
dalba/N
damtula/Vrlfh
damtulabu/Vrlfh
dangna/Vrlfh
dara/Vrlfk
daranu/Vrlfh
dargiya/Vrlfh
dari/Vrlfk
dasata/Vrlfh
dayabu/Vrlfh
dayana/Vrlfh
debe/Vrlfh
dedu/Vrlfh
dedubu/Vrlfh
deijibu/Vrlfh
delixe/Vrlfh
demesile/Vrlfh
dendenu/Vrlfh
dengselembidengne/Vrlfh
dengsi/Vrlfh
derbebu/Vrlfh
desere/Vrlpk
desunggiye/Vrlfh
deyenggule/Vrlfh
dodobu/Vrlfh
dokolo/Vrlfh
doksira/Vrlfh
donjibu/Vrlfh
doolabu/Vrlfh
doose/N
doosida/Vrlfh
dorgi/N
dorolono/Vrlfh
dosi/Vrlfk
dosobu/Vrlfh
dube/N
dufede/Vrlfh
dukse/Vrlfh
dulimba/N
dunda/Vrlfh
durge/Vrlfh
dursule/Vrlfh
duyembu/Vrlfh
dzanselabu/Vrlfh
eberembu/Vrlfh
ebixene/Vrlfh
ebixenu/Vrlfh
ebunu/Vrlfh
efice/Vrlfh
efule/Vrlfh
eimebu/Vrlfh
ejelebu/Vrlfh
ejelenu/Vrlfh
ekxe/Vrlfh
elbibu/Vrlfh
elbine/Vrlfh
elde/Vrlpk
ele/Vrlfh
elhexebu/Vrlfh
eljendu/Vrlfh
eme/N
emilebu/Vrlfh
encule/Vrlfh
enggele/Vrlfh
eniye/N
erdemu/N
ere/N
ergele/Vrlfh
ergi/N
ergingge/N
erguwe/Vrlfh
erin/N
ertu/Vrlfh
eshure/Vrlfh
etenggile/Vrlfh
etubu/Vrlfh
eyerje/Vrlfh
facihiyaxa/Vrlfh
facihiyaxanu/Vrlfh
faha/Vrlfh
faidandu/Vrlfh
faihaca/Vrlfh
faja/Vrlfh
faksida/Vrlfh
falga/N
falibu/Vrlfh
fangkabu/Vrlfh
fara/Vrlfk
farfabu/Vrlfh
fargana/Vrlfh
fatanji/Vrlfh
fathaxa/Vrlfh
faxxandu/Vrlfh
fehubu/Vrlfh
feku/Vrlfh
fekumbu/Vrlfh
fempile/Vrlfh
ferguwebu/Vrlfh
ferhele/Vrlfh
fetenu/Vrlfh
fexxe/Vrlfh
fidene/Vrlfh
fifa/Vrlfk
fime/Vrlfh
firge/Vrlfh
firubu/Vrlfh
fiyahana/Vrlfh
fiyanara/Vrlfh
fiyaringgiya/Vrlfh
fiyokoro/Vrlfh
foifo/Vrlfh
fokjihiyada/Vrlfh
fon/N
fongso/Vrlfh
fonjindu/Vrlfh
forgoxo/Vrlfh
foyodo/Vrlfh
fucebu/Vrlfh
fucihiya/Vrlfh
fudara/Vrlfk
fudenji/Vrlfh
fufubu/Vrlfh
fuhaxabu/Vrlfh
fukjixa/Vrlfh
fularja/Vrlfh
fulha/Vrlfh
funfula/Vrlfh
funiyehele/Vrlfh
funtura/Vrlfh
fuseje/Vrlfh
fusere/Vrlfh
fushu/Vrlfh
futalabu/Vrlfh
fuye/Vrlfh
fuyenu/Vrlfh
gacilabu/Vrlfh
gadara/Vrlfk
gahvxata/Vrlfh
gaibuxa/Vrlfh
gaila/Vrlfk
gamjida/Vrlfh
gana/Vrlfh
gardaxa/Vrlfh
gasandu/Vrlfh
gasanu/Vrlfh
gasihiya/Vrlfh
gehule/Vrlfh
gejihexe/Vrlfh
gejurebu/Vrlfh
genggu/Vrlfh
geodebu/Vrlfh
gercile/Vrlfh
getukele/Vrlfh
getukelebu/Vrlfh
gibala/Vrlfh
gile/Vrlfh
gilerje/Vrlfh
gilja/Vrlfh
giohoxo/Vrlfh
giri/Vrlfh
giru/Vrlfh
gisa/Vrlfk
giyabalabu/Vrlfh
giyabsara/Vrlfk
giyahalca/Vrlfh
giyangnanu/Vrlfh
giyangsi/Vrlfh
giyari/Vrlfh
goci/Vrlfk
godo/Vrlfh
godonu/Vrlfh
gohodo/Vrlfh
goli/Vrlfk
golobu/Vrlfh
golonu/Vrlfh
gugurxe/Vrlfh
guku/Vrlfh
gurubu/Vrlfh
gurunembiguruna/Vrlfh
guwaliya/Vrlfk
guwan/N
guwasa/Vrlfk
gv/Vrlfh
gvbcibu/Vrlfh
gvla/Vrlfh
gvli/Vrlfk
gvrba/Vrlfh
gvsula/Vrlfh
gvwacihiyala/Vrlfh
gvwaxxabu/Vrlfh
habcihiyada/Vrlfh
habtaxa/Vrlfh
hacihiyanji/Vrlfh
hacingga/N
hacu/Vrlfk
hadubu/Vrlfh
hafixa/Vrlfh
hafu/Vrlfk
hafula/Vrlfh
haga/Vrlfh
haidarxa/Vrlfh
haihara/Vrlfh
haira/Vrlfk
hajila/Vrlfh
haksa/Vrlfk
halana/Vrlfh
halanji/Vrlfh
halgi/Vrlfh
hami/Vrlfk
hamta/Vrlfh
hangnabu/Vrlfh
harhvda/Vrlfh
harxanu/Vrlfh
hashala/Vrlfh
hatara/Vrlfh
hayada/Vrlfh
hebdebu/Vrlfh
hedere/Vrlfh
hefeliyene/Vrlfh
hehe/N
helede/Vrlfh
hendubu/Vrlfh
hengkilene/Vrlfh
hengkixe/Vrlfh
here/Vrlfh
hergibu/Vrlfh
hesite/Vrlfh
heturebu/Vrlfh
hibcara/Vrlfh
hicu/Vrlfh
hio/N
hisala/Vrlfh
hithe/Vrlfh
hiyabsalabu/Vrlfh
hiyooxula/Vrlfh
hohodo/Vrlfh
hoihala/Vrlfh
hoila/Vrlfk
hoktoxo/Vrlfh
holo/N
holtobu/Vrlfh
hontoholo/Vrlfh
huju/Vrlfh
hukside/Vrlfh
hukxembu/Vrlfh
humara/Vrlfk
hutu/N
huweje/Vrlfh
huwekiyebu/Vrlfh
huwengkiye/Vrlfh
hvbu/Vrlfh
hvdula/Vrlfh
hvjibu/Vrlfh
hvlanu/Vrlfh
hvlha/Vrlfh
hvsi/Vrlfh
hvsutulebu/Vrlfh
hvwaita/Vrlfh
hvwaliyambu/Vrlfh
hvwaxan/Ns
ibenu/Vrlfh
ibka/Vrlfhk
iburxa/Vrlfh
icihiyanu/Vrlfh
ikta/Vrlfk
ikvbu/Vrlfh
ilada/Vrlfh
ildu/Vrlfk
iletulebu/Vrlfh
imiyele/Vrlfh
indebu/Vrlfh
irgebu/Vrlfh
isi/Vrlfk
isibu/Vrlfh
isihidabu/Vrlfh
jafa/Vrlfh
jaka/N
jakana/Vrlfh
jakarabu/Vrlfh
jakjara/Vrlfk
jaksa/Vrlfk
jala/Vrlfk
jalu/Vrlpk
jamara/Vrlfh
jasibu/Vrlfh
jekene/Vrlfh
jife/Vrlfh
jilgibu/Vrlfh
jiramilabu/Vrlfh
joho/Vrlfh
joholi/Vrlfk
jolibu/Vrlfh
jondo/Vrlfh
joto/Vrlfh
jujura/Vrlfh
juktelebu/Vrlfh
juli/Vrlfk
jura/Vrlfk
jusu/Vrlfh
kabu/Vrlfh
kaica/Vrlfh
kanggilja/Vrlfk
kangka/Vrlfh
kapara/Vrlfk
kaparabu/Vrlfh
karanji/Vrlfh
kecude/Vrlfh
kelfixe/Vrlfh
kenehunjebu/Vrlfh
kimule/Vrlfh
kiyakiya/Vrlfh
kiyamna/Vrlfh
kokirabu/Vrlfh
komolo/Vrlfh
koro/Vrlfh
kubuli/Vrlfk
kui/N
kurcile/Vrlfh
kuturce/Vrlfh
kvbulibu/Vrlfh
laifara/Vrlfk
laihvxa/Vrlfh
lakiyabu/Vrlfh
lashalabu/Vrlfh
laya/Vrlfk
lifada/Vrlfh
liyeliyexe/Vrlfh
longtolo/Vrlfh
makta/Vrlfh
maktanu/Vrlfh
malhvxandu/Vrlfh
masila/Vrlfh
matabu/Vrlfh
maya/Vrlfkh
mehu/Vrlfh
melexete/Vrlfh
melkexe/Vrlfh
mentuhure/Vrlfh
milara/Vrlfk
mishala/Vrlfh
mitabu/Vrlfh
miyari/Vrlfh
monjibu/Vrlfh
monjirxa/Vrlfh
moselabu/Vrlfh
mukde/Vrlfhk
murki/Vrlfh
muruxe/Vrlfh
muse/N
mutebu/Vrlfh
nara/Vrlfk
narga/Vrlfh
nargabu/Vrlfh
nasabu/Vrlfh
nemsele/Vrlfh
nemxe/Vrlfh
nerebu/Vrlfh
nimahaxa/Vrlfh
nimara/Vrlfh
ninggu/N
niniyarxa/Vrlfh
nitara/Vrlfk
niyakvra/Vrlfh
niyamala/Vrlfh
niyangniyara/Vrlfk
niyasu/Vrlfk
nonggi/Vrlfh
nonggina/Vrlfh
nora/Vrlfh
nure/N
obu/Vrlfh
oholiyo/Vrlfh
oihorilabu/Vrlfh
omiholobu/Vrlfh
omilabu/Vrlfh
oncodo/Vrlfh
sabsibu/Vrlfh
sabu/Vrlfh
sabunji/Vrlfh
sahara/Vrlfk
saisa/N
sakda/Vrlkp
salabu/Vrlfh
salandu/Vrlfh
sangsara/Vrlfk
sara/Vrlfk
saringgiya/Vrlfh
sasa/Vrlfh
sehe/N
sejile/Vrlfh
sekiyebu/Vrlfh
sere/N
seremxe/Vrlfh
seshete/Vrlfh
sica/Vrlfk
sida/Vrlfk
sidara/Vrlfk
sidarabu/Vrlfh
siden/N
sifi/Vrlfh
sihabu/Vrlfh
simnebu/Vrlfh
sinahila/Vrlfh
singge/Vrlfh
sioi/N
sithv/Vrlfh
soilo/Vrlfh
soktobu/Vrlfh
songko/N
sono/Vrlfh
sosandu/Vrlfh
sosorco/Vrlfh
suhara/Vrlfk
suila/Vrlfh
suisi/Vrlfk
sujabu/Vrlfh
sukiyabu/Vrlfh
sukv/N
suma/Vrlfk
sungge/Vrlfh
surtenu/Vrlfh
susa/Vrlfhk
suwaliya/Vrlfh
tacibu/Vrlfh
tacinu/Vrlfh
tafa/Vrlfk
tafanji/Vrlfh
takda/Vrlfk
takvrandu/Vrlfh
talgi/Vrlfh
talma/Vrlfk
tamali/Vrlfh
targabu/Vrlfh
tarinu/Vrlfh
tasha/N
tatabu/Vrlfh
tebkele/Vrlfh
tece/Vrlfh
teisule/Vrlfh
tenggelje/Vrlfh
teode/Vrlfh
tere/N
teyebu/Vrlfh
tokto/Vrlfh
tolgi/Vrlfk
tolo/Vrlfh
tonggoli/Vrlfh
toosela/Vrlfh
tosobu/Vrlfh
tuba/N
tuhenji/Vrlfh
tule/Vrlfh
tunggala/Vrlfh
tungserembihafumbu/Vrlfh
turgun/N
tuwakiya/Vrlfh
tuwamgiya/Vrlfh
tuwara/N
tuwaxata/Vrlfh
uba/N
uba/Vrlfk
ubaliya/Vrlfk
ubaxabu/Vrlfh
ucu/Vrlfh
ufabu/Vrlfh
uihe/N
ujelebu/Vrlfh
ujinembiujina/Vrlfh
uksile/Vrlfh
ule/Vrlfh
ulhibu/Vrlfh
umiyahana/Vrlfh
unggibu/Vrlfh
untuxe/Vrlfh
ura/Vrlfk
urgunjendu/Vrlfh
uruxe/Vrlfh
usa/Vrlfk
usanu/Vrlfh
usu/Vrlfh
uye/Vrlfh
wacihiyabu/Vrlfh
wakala/Vrlfh
wangna/Vrlfh
waru/Vrlfk
wasi/Vrlfk
wehiyendu/Vrlfh
weihe/N
welmiye/Vrlfh
were/Vrlfh
xabi/Ns
xadabu/Vrlfh
xampila/Vrlfh
xanu/Vrlfh
xe/Vrlfh
xen/N
xere/Vrlfh
xeterxe/Vrlfh
xetuhen/N
xentuhen/N
xorgina/Vrlfh
xu/N
xuburxe/Vrlfh
xufabu/Vrlfh
xunggiya/Vrlfh
xurubu/Vrlfh
xusile/Vrlfh
yahila/Vrlfh
yamula/Vrlfh
yanggilandu/Vrlfh
yarkiyandu/Vrlfh
yeke/Vrlfh
yertebu/Vrlfh
yohi/Vrlfk
yuburxe/Vrlfh
